District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.11

Occupations and Professions Licensure Special Account.

(a)

In accordance with § 47-131(c)(4), there is hereby established within the General Fund of the District of Columbia a special account, called the Occupations and Professions Licensing Special Account to which shall be credited, without regard to fiscal year limitation pursuant to an act of Congress, the fees that are identified in §§ 47-2839 and 47-2839.01, and this subchapter.

(b)

No revenues deposited into the continuing, nonlapsing special account may be obligated or spent in any year without a Congressional appropriation. Revenues in this continuing, nonlapsing special account that are carried over into a succeeding fiscal year may not be obligated or spent in the succeeding year without a new Congressional appropriation that permits such obligation or expenditure.

(c)

Subject to the applicable laws relating to the appropriation of District funds, monies received and deposited in the Occupation and Professions Licensure Special Account shall be used to defray the expenses to discharge the administrative and regulatory duties as prescribed by §§ 47-2839 and 47-2839.01, and this subchapter. The special account shall not be used by any other District government agency and shall be used solely to carry out the functions of §§ 47-2839 and 47-2839.01, and this subchapter.

(d)

The special account shall be continuing. Revenues deposited into the special account shall not revert to the General Fund at the end of any fiscal year or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in §§ 47-2839 and 47-2839.01, and this subchapter subject to authorization by Congress in an appropriations act.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 3012(c), 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2839, § 47-2839.01, and § 47-2853.99.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.11.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “§§ 47-2839 and 47-2839.01, and this subchapter” for “this subchapter” in (a), twice in (c), and in (d).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3012(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3012(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 3011 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle B of Title III of the act may be cited the “Security Licensing Streamlining Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.